Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
LOANS AND INVESTMENTS

§412:5-300 Applicability of part. This
part sets forth the requirements and restrictions for lending and investments
by all banks. A bank may make loans and extensions of credit and may invest
its assets as may be permitted by this part and as may be provided elsewhere in
this article. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next